Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 1. Alaska Militia.

Sec. 26.05.010.
Alaska militia established.

The militia of the state consists of all able-bodied citizens of the United States and all other able-bodied persons who have declared their intention to become citizens of the United States, who reside in the state, who are at least 17 years of age, and who are eligible for military service under the laws of the United States or this state.

The militia is divided into two classes:

the organized militia, consisting of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, and the Alaska State Defense Force; and

the unorganized militia, consisting of all qualified persons available for service but not serving in the organized militia.

The adjutant general may, by regulation, prescribe the maximum age for eligibility in the militia.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 2000)

Sec. 26.05.020.
Exemption from military service.

The following are exempt from militia service: persons exempt by the laws of the United States, judges of the courts of the state, and members and officers of the state legislature.

History.

(§ 3 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.030.
Composition of organized militia.

The Alaska National Guard consists of

members of the militia who have voluntarily enlisted and who, upon original enlistment, are organized, armed, equipped, and federally recognized according to the laws of the United States; and

commissioned officers and warrant officers who are citizens of the United States, having the qualifications prescribed by federal law and regulations, and who are appointed and commissioned or warranted by the governor.

Former members of the regular Army, Navy, or Marine Corps under 64 years of age may enlist in the Alaska Militia.

The Alaska Naval Militia consists of units authorized by the governor, organized, equipped, trained, and administered as prescribed by state and federal law and regulation, and manned by personnel who are

members of the United States Naval Reserve or the United States Marine Corps Reserve and

enlisted, appointed, commissioned, or warranted under the laws and regulations of the United States.

The Alaska State Defense Force consists of units authorized by the governor and manned by volunteer personnel qualifying under state law and regulation. All Alaska State Defense Force personnel shall be

appointed, commissioned, or warranted, and assigned by the governor or the adjutant general as the governor’s designee;

subject to serve on state active duty at the call and by order of the governor.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 102 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 25 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

The 2000 amendments to this section were harmonized by the revisor.

Sec. 26.05.040.
Ratification and confirmation of existing military forces. [Repealed, § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 26.05.050.
Authority for organization.

The governor as commander in chief may organize units in communities so requesting and specifically provide for organization of at least two scout battalions in the western and northwestern coastal areas and northern Arctic regions of the state, in accordance with special authority of the United States Department of Defense.

History.

(§ 6 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.060.
Control of Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia.

The governor as ex officio commander of the militia of the state has command of the Alaska National Guard and the Alaska Naval Militia while they are not in active federal service. The governor may adopt necessary regulations for them. The Alaska National Guard and the Alaska Naval Militia and their members are subject to all federal laws and regulations relating to the National Guard and Naval Militia of the several states and territories and of the United States.

History.

(§ 7 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.05.070.
Governor may order organized militia into active state service.

In the event of war, disaster, insurrection, rebellion, tumult, catastrophe, wildland fire, invasion, or riot; or if a mob or body of men act together by force with intent to commit a felony or to offer violence to persons or property, or by force and violence to break and resist the laws of the state, or the United States; or in the case of imminent danger of the occurrence of any of these events; or whenever responsible civil authorities fail to preserve law and order, or protect life and property, or the governor believes that failure is imminent, the governor may order the organized militia or any part of it, into active state service to execute the laws and to perform duties in connection with them that the governor considers proper. Whenever any portion of the militia is ordered into active state service by the governor, it becomes an additional police force, retaining its separate entity and operating at all times as a military organization under military command, with power to cooperate with but not to supersede the existing civilian law enforcement officers whenever possible, for the re-establishment of law and order and for the protection of life and property. The governor may also order members of the organized militia to active state service, with their consent, for the purpose of training or for full-time duty with the office of the adjutant general. In the event of wildland fire, the governor may delegate to the adjutant general the governor’s authority under this section to order some or all of the organized militia into active state service to fight wildland fire. In this section, “wildland fire” includes the uncontrolled burning of grass, brush, timber, and other vegetative material.

History.

(§ 8 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2008)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2008 (HB 326) relating to use of the organized militia in active service, including service related to fighting wildfires, see 2008 House Journal 1737 — 1739.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska State Defense Force (ASDF) is a “State law enforcement agency” when it is called to active state service under AS

26.05.070

to assist the Coast Guard. ASDF personnel are “State law enforcement officers” for purposes of assisting the Coast Guard. The law enforcement authority of the ASDF is limited by the terms and purpose of the activation order and may also be limited by the Coast Guard in its request for assistance. 2006 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 26.05.075.
Leave and reemployment rights of the organized militia.

An employer shall grant a leave of absence to an employee who is

a member of the organized militia to perform active state service under AS

26.05.070

; or

a resident of the state and a member of the National Guard of another state to perform active National Guard service under a law of that state.

When an employee is released from a period of active state service under AS

26.05.070

or active National Guard service under the law of another state, or discharged from hospitalization that arose from that active service, the employee is entitled to return to the employee’s former position, or a comparable position, at the pay, seniority, and benefit level the employee would have had if the employee had not been absent as a result of that active service. An employee, other than an employee who has been hospitalized, shall report for work at the beginning of the workday following the last calendar day necessary to travel from the site of active state service, or active National Guard service in another state, to the employee’s work site. An employee who has been hospitalized shall report for work at the beginning of the workday following the last calendar day necessary to travel from the hospital or place of recuperation to the employee’s work site. If the employee fails to return to work at that time, the employer may impose whatever discipline is provided by the employer’s rules of conduct for unexcused absence from work.

If an employee is not qualified to perform the duties of the employee’s position as a result of permanent disability sustained because of the employee’s active state service but is qualified to perform the duties of another position with the employer, the employer shall offer an employee who requests reemployment the available, vacant position that most closely approximates the pay and benefits of the employee’s previous position and that the employee is qualified for and capable of performing. An employee loses the right to reemployment under this subsection unless the employee requests reemployment within 30 days after receiving a statement from the employee’s treating physician indicating both that the employee has reached maximum recovery and that the employee is released to return to full-time work.

For employees other than state employees, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall enforce this section by appropriate regulations. For state employees, the division of personnel in the Department of Administration shall enforce this section. Regulations adopted under this section may provide for orders of reinstatement and back pay if appropriate. For employees other than state employees, contested cases arising under this section are to be handled under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

. Appeals involving state employees must be made to the personnel board under the procedure set out in the state’s personnel rules for grievances.

Notwithstanding (f) of this section, a person aggrieved under this section may bring an action in superior court no sooner than 30 days after giving notice to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, or, in the case of a state employee, to the director of the division of personnel. The action must be brought within two years after the claim arose.

A collective bargaining agreement entered into in the state after September 2, 1990 may not contain provisions contrary to this subsection.

This section does not affect AS

39.20.340

or

39.20.350

governing paid leave and reinstatement of state and local employees for certain military activities.

An employee is not entitled to return to the employee’s former position, or a comparable position, at the pay, seniority, and benefit level the employee would have had if

the employer’s circumstances have changed, making employment impossible or unreasonable; or

employment would impose an undue hardship on the employer.

In this section, “state” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 36 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (d) and (e) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 21, 2018, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “a leave of absence” following “shall grant”, in (a)(1), deleted “a leave of absence” following “organized militia”, added (a)(2), and made related change; in (b), inserted “or active National Guard service under the law of another state,” following “AS

26.05.070

” and substituted “that active service” for “active state service” twice in the first sentence, in the second sentence inserted “, or active National Guard service in another state,” following “active state service”; added (h) and (i).

Sec. 26.05.080.
Decision of governor final.

Whenever any portion of the militia is ordered to duty by the governor, the decision of the governor in this matter is final.

History.

(§ 9 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.090.
Proclamations of martial law.

The governor may proclaim martial law when the public safety requires it in case of rebellion or actual or imminent invasion, and may order all or any part of the organized militia into active state service to enforce the proclamation. The militia shall assume only those functions of civil government specified by the governor, or those that, in the discretion of the militia commander, must be assumed in order to accomplish a specific mission assigned by the governor. Martial law may not continue for longer than 20 days without the approval of a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.

History.

(§ 10 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1968)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 45, SLA 1968 (HCSSB 246), see 1968 House Journal, p. 422.

Sec. 26.05.100.
Alaska State Defense Force.

A state militia, known as the Alaska State Defense Force, may be organized through voluntary enlistments under regulations as to discipline and training that may be prescribed by the governor. During the time that the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia, or any part of either of them, is not available to the state by reason of active federal service, or the National Guard or Naval Militia requires augmentation to perform its state mission, the governor may activate the Alaska State Defense Force.

History.

(§ 11 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 159 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 2000)

Sec. 26.05.110.
Governor may order unorganized militia into active service.

In the event of imminent invasion by a foreign power and for the same reasons set forth in AS

26.05.070

, if the governor has ordered into active service all of the available organized militia or if the organized militia is in active federal service, the governor may order the unorganized militia or any portion of it considered necessary into active service, and have them perform military duty for the state subject to this chapter, as the circumstances require.

History.

(§ 12 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.120.
Penalty for failure to obey call.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.130.
Penalty for physician making false certificate.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.135.
Applicability of Servicemembers Civil Relief Act to members of the organized militia; contracts.

The provisions of 50 U.S.C. 3901 — 4043 (Servicemembers Civil Relief Act), pertaining to consumer transactions and the temporary suspension of enforcement of civil liabilities of persons in the military service of the United States apply to members of the organized militia while on active duty for the state by order of the governor.

In addition to the rights and protections provided under 50 U.S.C. 3901 — 4043 (Servicemembers Civil Relief Act) and (a) of this section, a servicemember may terminate a contract for any of the following services provided in this state if the servicemember receives official orders to relocate for a period of military service of at least 90 days to a location that does not support the contract and the servicemember provides written notice to the service provider as required under (c) of this section:

Internet services;

athletic club or gym memberships;

satellite radio services; or

television services.

To terminate a contract under (b) of this section, the servicemember shall provide the service provider with (1) written notice that the servicemember is terminating the contract and the date the contract terminates, and (2) proof of the official orders calling the servicemember into active military service. If possible, the servicemember shall provide the proof of the official orders at the same time the servicemember provides written notice terminating the contract. If, because of military necessity or other circumstances, the servicemember is unable to provide proof of official orders at the time the servicemember provides written notice terminating the contract, the servicemember shall provide proof of the official orders not more than 90 days after providing written notice terminating the contract. A termination of contract under this section is effective on the later of the following: the termination date the servicemember indicates in the written notice terminating the contract or the date the servicemember provides the written notice terminating the contract.

A servicemember who terminates a contract under this section may reinstate the contract when the servicemember is no longer in active military service if the servicemember provides written notice not later than 90 days after the active military service ends. Not later than 30 days after receiving a written notice of reinstatement of a contract under this subsection, a service provider shall resume providing services under the contract to the servicemember or, if the services previously provided are no longer available, shall provide substantially similar services to the servicemember.

A service provider may not charge to a servicemember a penalty, fee, or other cost, or retain the deposit of a servicemember, who terminates a contract under this section. A servicemember who terminates a contract under this section is not liable for payment for any services after the effective date of the termination of a contract under this section.

In this section,

“organized militia” includes the units of the militia described in AS

26.05.010(b)(1)

;

“servicemember” means a member of the armed forces of the United States or a member of the organized militia of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1976; am §§ 7, 8 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendments to this section apply “only to a contract entered into on or after August 14, 2018”, see sec. 42(a), ch. 85, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, in (a), substituted “50 U.S.C. 3901 — 4043 (Servicemembers Civil Relief Act)” for “50 U.S.C. App. 501 — 590,” following “The provisions of”, substituted “organized militia” for “Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia” following “apply to members of the”; added (b) — (f). Although the 2018 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until August 13, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendments was August 14, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 26.05.140.
Suits against officers and enlisted persons.

Members of the militia ordered into active service for the state by order of the governor are not liable civilly for any act done by them in their official capacity while in such service. If a suit is commenced in a court against an officer or enlisted person of the militia as a result of an act done by the officer or enlisted person in an official capacity while in active service, the defendant may be defended by the attorney general at the expense of the state but the defendant may employ private counsel. Nothing in this subsection applies to a proceeding or action brought under this chapter or the code of military justice.

The state has not waived its sovereign immunity and is not liable for the acts or omissions of members of the organized militia, unless those members were ordered into active state service by the governor under AS

26.05.070

and the members were acting in the line of duty of those orders. This subsection does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct within the course and scope of employment or agency and with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

History.

(§ 15 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose applicable to (b) of this section, see § 1, ch. 43, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 7, 2016, in (a), deleted “or criminally” following “civilly” in the first sentence, deleted “require the person instituting the suit to give security for the payment of costs. If judgment is for the defendant, treble costs shall be assessed against the plaintiff. The defendant in the action shall” preceding “be defended by” in the second sentence, added the last sentence. Although the 2016 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2016, under § 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until August 6, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendment was August 7, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added subsection (b), see 2003 House Journal 777—783.

Collateral references. —

Official immunity of state national guard members, 52 ALR4th 1095.

Sec. 26.05.145.
Suits by members of the military services.

A civil action for damages may not be brought by or on behalf of a member of the military services against the state or against any employee of the state or any member or former member of the Alaska militia for wrongful death, personal injury, or other tort claim or injury arising out of activities that were incident to the member’s military service.

This section does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct within the course and scope of employment or agency and with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

In this section, “military service” means service in the United States military, the militia described in AS

26.05.010(b)

, or the national guard of another state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 43 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, subsection (b) was relettered as (c), and subsection (c) was relettered as (b).

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose applicable to this section, see § 1, ch. 43, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For applicability provision relating to this section, see § 13, ch. 43, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added this section, see 2003 House Journal 777—783.

Sec. 26.05.150.
Not liable for exercise of judgment.

A commanding officer of the Alaska militia engaged under proper authority in the suppression of any of those acts listed in AS

26.05.070

may determine the means to be used in controlling or dispersing any mob or other unlawful assembly. A commanding officer who exercises this discretion is not liable in either a civil or criminal action for an act done in the line of duty.

History.

(§ 16 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.160.
Appointment, qualifications, and duties of adjutant general.

The adjutant general of the state is appointed by the governor. In appointing the adjutant general, the governor may give preference to a person who has served at least five years in the Alaska Army National Guard or the Alaska Air National Guard. The governor shall prescribe the grade of the adjutant general, which may not exceed lieutenant general. To be eligible for appointment as adjutant general, a person must be a citizen of the state and must be a federally recognized general-grade officer in the Alaska National Guard or an officer who has the qualifications to gain federal recognition as a general-grade officer either in active status or in retirement status eligible for reappointment as a general-grade officer. The adjutant general shall make returns and reports to the Chief, National Guard Bureau, and to the governor or to the officers designated by the Chief, National Guard Bureau, and the governor, at the times and in the form prescribed.

The adjutant general shall execute a bond running to the state in the penal sum of $20,000 conditioned upon the faithful performance of the adjutant general’s duties. The attorney general shall approve the bond and the bond shall be filed with the Department of Administration. The state shall pay the cost of the bond.

The adjutant general is the official liaison between the state and the active military in the state. The adjutant general shall provide advice and assistance to state agencies having dealings with the active military in the state.

The adjutant general is the official liaison between the state and the federal Department of Veterans Affairs. The adjutant general shall provide advice and assistance to state agencies having dealings with the federal Department of Veterans Affairs.

The adjutant general is the official liaison between the state and the Federal Emergency Management Agency in the state. The adjutant general shall provide advice and assistance to state agencies having dealings with the Federal Emergency Management Agency.

History.

(§ 17 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2007)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military, and Civil Defense, §§ 36—46.

6 C.J.S., Armed Services, § 344.

Sec. 26.05.170.
Governor’s command and instructions exercised through the adjutant general.

The governor’s command is exercised through the adjutant general, who shall carry out the policies of the governor in military affairs. The adjutant general represents the governor and shall act in conformity with the governor’s instructions. The adjutant general shall exercise control over the military department of the state.

History.

(§ 18 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.180.
Headquarters staff of Alaska National Guard.

The headquarters of the Alaska National Guard is composed of an Army National Guard component, an Air National Guard component and a Naval Militia component. The Army National Guard component and the Air National Guard component shall each be commanded by an assistant adjutant general appointed by the adjutant general with the concurrence of the governor. An assistant adjutant general shall, while holding office, have the grade of brigadier general or a lower grade that the adjutant general may prescribe. On initial appointment an assistant adjutant general must hold a federally-recognized field-grade commission with at least five years service in the Alaska Army National Guard or in the Alaska Air National Guard.

The adjutant general may appoint necessary officers, enlisted persons, and civilian employees to the headquarters staff.

History.

(§ 19 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1973)

Sec. 26.05.185.
Assistant adjutant general for space and missile defense.

The adjutant general, with the concurrence of the governor, may appoint an assistant adjutant general for space and missile defense. The adjutant general for space and missile defense is the official military representative of the state in matters pertaining to the development and deployment of a missile defense program in this state.

The assistant adjutant general for space and missile defense shall be a federally recognized general-grade officer in the Alaska National Guard or an officer in the grade of colonel in the Alaska National Guard who has qualifications to gain federal recognition as a general-grade officer.

The position of assistant adjutant general for space and missile defense is authorized for the duration of the development and deployment of a missile defense program in this state, subject to the availability of federal funding for that purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2001)

Sec. 26.05.190.
Administration.

The adjutant general shall adopt and publish orders and regulations not contrary to law that in the adjutant general’s judgment are necessary to bring the organizations, armament, equipment, and discipline of the organized militia to a high degree of efficiency. The adjutant general shall perform all the administrative functions incident to the operation of the Alaska National Guard and the Alaska Naval Militia. In addition the adjutant general shall have an inventory taken at least once each year of all state military stores, property, and funds under the jurisdiction of the adjutant general.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 37 SLA 1968.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 66 SLA 1967.]

The adjutant general shall maintain the Alaska Decoration of Honor Roll.

History.

(§ 20 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 1973; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2007)

Sec. 26.05.200.
Officers’ qualifications, appointment, and tenure.

A person may not be commissioned or warranted in an office of the National Guard or the Naval Militia of the state unless the person is examined and adjudged qualified for the office by an examining board appointed by the commander in chief, except that at the discretion of the adjutant general the proceedings of federal examining boards may be accepted instead of a state board. The composition, appointment, and procedure of examining boards and the nature and scope of examinations shall be as prescribed by the military laws or regulations of the United States or this state.

History.

(§ 21 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1973)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military and Civil Defense, § 41.

6 C.J.S. Armed Services § 344.

Sec. 26.05.210.
Removal of officers.

The adjutant general and the assistant adjutants general serve at the pleasure of the governor.

When federal recognition of an officer’s commission or warrant has been withdrawn, the officer’s state appointment as a commissioned or warrant officer may be terminated, and the commission or warrant vacated upon the recommendation of the adjutant general and approval of the governor.

When a commissioned or warrant officer has successfully completed the prescribed term of service so as to be eligible for retirement, the officer may be placed upon the retired list upon the recommendation of the adjutant general and approval of the governor.

Commissioned or warrant officers may tender their resignations through National Guard or Naval Militia command channels. Resignations shall be in writing, stating the reason for resignation, and shall take effect when accepted by the adjutant general upon the approval of the governor.

History.

(§ 22 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1973)

Sec. 26.05.220.
Retired list.

A commissioned officer and enlisted person upon reaching the maximum age prescribed for active duty by appropriate regulations and a commissioned officer or enlisted person who is disabled or incapacitated for active duty through no personal fault or dereliction, and a commissioned officer or enlisted person who serves honorably with the Alaska National Guard or with the Alaska Naval Militia in any capacity and is unable to perform further active duty due to limitations imposed by appropriate regulations may be placed upon the retired list upon recommendation by the adjutant general and approval of the governor.

History.

(§ 23 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 34 SLA 1973)

Sec. 26.05.222.
Creation and administration of Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system.

There is established an Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system. The commissioner of administration shall administer the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system.

The commissioner of administration may adopt regulations to implement the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system. Regulations adopted by the commissioner under this subsection relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 137 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For national guard/naval militia retirement system, see 2 AAC 37, art. 5.

Sec. 26.05.223.
Commencement of participation in system.

A member of the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia shall be included in this system upon commencement of membership in the Alaska National Guard, or on January 1, 1973, whichever is later, or upon commencement of membership in the Alaska Naval Militia or on July 1, 1980, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 146 SLA 1980)

Sec. 26.05.224.
Retirement benefits.

An active member of the Alaska National Guard, or a former member who was an active member on or after January 1, 1969, or a member of the Alaska Naval Militia on or after July 1, 1980, is eligible for a retirement pension

upon voluntary retirement from the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia after a total of 20 years or more of satisfactory service in the Alaska National Guard, Alaska Naval Militia, or the armed forces of the United States, and the reserves of them, or any combination of service in these components if at least five years of the service is in the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia; or

upon involuntary separation because of federal standards imposed on the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia, regardless of length of service, unless the separation occurs as a result of the member’s own misconduct, misrepresentation, or unwillingness to satisfy established standards for continued participation.

The retirement pension is $100 a month, payable for the same number of months that the member participated satisfactorily in the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia. The member may instead elect to receive the retirement pension

in a lump sum that is actuarially determined to be equal to the value, at the time of retirement, of the entire pension due; or

in a monthly amount that will result in payment by the member’s 72nd birthday of an amount that is determined to be the actuarial equivalent of the entire pension due at the time of retirement.

An eligible member or former member may elect to receive the retirement pension beginning on the first day of the month in which the member or former member becomes eligible for retirement, or the member or former member may elect to defer payment to a later date. Payment of a deferred retirement benefit may not begin until application for the benefit is filed with and approved by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs. Deferred retirement payments shall be made monthly at the rate of $100, unless the member elects another form of payment under (b) of this section.

Upon the death of an active member who has at least five years service in the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia or a combination of these components, the member’s designated beneficiary is entitled to a lump sum benefit calculated in accordance with (b) of this section. Upon the death of a former member who has at least 20 years service, the former member’s designated beneficiary is entitled to a lump sum benefit calculated in accordance with (b) of this section less any retirement benefits previously paid. Except as provided in (e) of this section, a member may change or revoke the designation of a beneficiary without notice to the beneficiary at any time. If a member designates more than one beneficiary, each shares equally unless the member specifies a different allocation. The member shall make a designation of a beneficiary or a change or revocation of a beneficiary on a form provided by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs. It is not effective until filed with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs. If a member fails to designate a beneficiary or if no designated beneficiary survives the member, the department, except to the extent provided otherwise in a qualified domestic relations order, shall pay the death benefit under this subsection to the

surviving spouse; or, if there is none surviving,

surviving children in equal parts; or, if there is none surviving,

surviving parents in equal parts; or, if there is none surviving,

member’s estate.

Notwithstanding any previous designation of beneficiary, the spouse of a member at the time of the member’s death automatically becomes the designated beneficiary if the spouse was married to the member during part of the member’s service under this chapter

except to the extent a qualified domestic relations order provides for payment to a former spouse or other dependent of the member; or

unless the member files with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs a revocation of beneficiary and a written consent to the revocation signed by the present spouse and each person entitled to benefits under the order on forms provided by the department; however, consent of the present spouse is not required if the member and the present spouse had been married for less than two years on the date of the member’s death and if the member established when filing the revocation that the member and the spouse were not cohabiting.

A person claiming entitlement to any benefits payable under this section shall provide the department with a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution decree, or other evidence of entitlement. Documents showing entitlement may be filed with the department immediately after a change in the member’s marital status. If the department does not receive notification of a claim before the date 10 days after the member’s death, the person claiming entitlement to the benefits is not entitled to receive from the Department of Administration or Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs any benefit already paid under this section.

Except as provided in this subsection or AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

, amounts held in the system on behalf of a member or other person who is or may become eligible for benefits under the system are exempt from Alaska state and municipal taxes and are not subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge of any kind, either voluntary or involuntary, before they are received by the person entitled to the amount under the terms of the system, and any attempt to anticipate, alienate, sell, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber, charge, or otherwise dispose of any right to amounts accrued in the system is void. However,

a member’s right to receive benefits or the member contribution account may be assigned

under a qualified domestic relations order; or

to a trust or similar legal device that meets the requirements for a Medicaid-qualifying trust under AS

47.07.020(f)

and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4);

a member may elect to have the taxable portion of the qualifying distributions transferred directly to another plan or individual retirement arrangement qualified under the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Amounts held in the system and benefits payable under this section are exempt from garnishment, execution, or levy as provided in AS 09.38 (Alaska Exemptions Act).

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am §§ 11, 12 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 58, §§ 4, 5 (1984); am § 11 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 29, 30 ch 117 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 41 SLA 1988; am § 26 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Sec. 26.05.225.
Earlier service.

A person who was a member of the Alaska National Guard on or after January 1, 1969, is entitled to credit for service to the state and former territory of Alaska as a member of the National Guard and Territorial Guard before and after January 1, 1969, in determining eligibility for retirement benefits under AS

26.05.224

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 146 SLA 1980)